Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Chapter 20. Alaska Nonprofit Corporation Act.

Cross references. —

For temporary provisions relating to shareholder meetings, proxies, and electronic communications during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 12, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.